Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF604.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 3.98, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Contents. (a) The fiscal note, where possible, shall: (1) cite the effect in dollar amounts; (2) cite the statutory provisions affected; (3) estimate the increase or decrease in revenues or expenditures; (4) include the costs which may be absorbed without additional funds; (5) include the assumptions used in determining the cost estimates; deleted text begin anddeleted text end new text begin (6) provide a dynamic analysis and a static analysis; and new text end deleted text begin (6)deleted text end new text begin (7)new text end specify any long-range implication. (b) The fiscal note may comment on technical or mechanical defects in the bill but shall express no opinions concerning the merits of the proposal.